Massachusetts, session 194th, S482.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 117A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the second paragraph and inserting in place
thereof the following paragraph:-
Any person eligible for assistance under this chapter who is not maintaining their home
and is receiving care in or residing in a licensed nursing facility, licensed chronic hospital,
licensed rest home, or an approved public medical institution as defined in section 8 of chapter
118E, shall retain the first $113.42 of their monthly income for clothing, personal needs, and
leisure time activities. If there is no such income or if it is less than the amount of $113.42, such
a person shall be paid monthly in advance the difference between such income and said amount.
of 3

Said amount shall be increased annually each fiscal year at the same time and at the same
percentage rate as increases payable to an individual who maintains their own home and receives
state supplementary payments pursuant to sections 1 and 2 of chapter 118A.
SECTION 2. Chapter 118A of General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 7A the following new section:-
Section 7B. Any person eligible for financial assistance under this chapter who is not
maintaining their home and is in a licensed medical facility which is eligible for medical
assistance payments pursuant to chapter 118E or is residing in a licensed rest home to which
such person pays a fixed rate, shall retain the first $113.42 of their monthly income for clothing,
personal needs, and leisure time activities. If there is no such income or if it is less than the
amount of $113.42, such a person shall be paid monthly in advance the difference between such
income and said amount. Said amount shall be increased annually each fiscal year at the same
time and at the same percentage rate as increases payable to an individual who maintains their
own home and receives state supplementary payments pursuant to sections 1 and 2 of this
chapter.
SECTION 3. Section 15 of chapter 118E of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking the fourth paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-
A person eligible for medical assistance under this chapter who is not maintaining their
own home and is receiving care in a licensed nursing facility, a licensed chronic hospital, a
licensed rest home, an approved public medical institution, or a public psychiatric institution
shall retain the first $113.42 of their monthly income for clothing, personal needs, and leisure
time activities. If there is no such income or if it is less than the amount of $113.42, such a
of 3

person shall be paid monthly in advance the difference between such income and said amount.
Said amount shall be increased annually each fiscal year at the same time and at the same
percentage rate as increases payable to an individual who is maintaining their own home and
who is receiving supplemental payments pursuant to sections 1 and 2 of chapter 118A.
SECTION 4. Section 15 of chapter 118E of the General laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking in the fifth paragraph the figure "$60" and inserting in place thereof the
following figure:- $113.42
of 3